Florida, session 2026, HB4007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Chapter 67-1702, Laws of Florida, is repealed.
Section 2. Sections 2, 3, and 4 and section 3 of chapter
65-1906, Laws of Florida, as amended by chapters 2001-295 and
2011-247, Laws of Florida, are amended to read:
Section 2. The money derived from this tax shall be paid
into the County Health Care Fund. The Martin County Board of
County Commissioners shall create by ordinance a process for the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4007 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4007 2026 Legislature
distribution of funds from the County Health Care Fund to be
disbursed between all licensed hospitals in Martin County. The
County Health Care Fund which shall be used by the Martin County
Board of County Commissioners only to pay for:
(1) Hospitalization, administrative costs and costs of
doctors' services incidental to and included in the cost of
hospital care, within Martin County for indigent residents of
Martin County. To qualify as an indigent resident, the applicant
must meet the following criteria:
(a) The applicant is a resident of Martin County for at
least six (6) months before the applicant's hospitalization;
(b) The applicant's family unit does not exceed the
household gross income equivalent to 150 percent of the federal
poverty guidelines;
(c) The applicant is not eligible for Medicaid or another
third-party payor program; and
(d) The applicant does not have liquid assets in excess of
8,000 dollars.
(2) Health care programs required by Florida Statutes to
be funded by counties.
(3) Other health care programs based upon a level of
service to be determined from time to time by the Martin County
Board of County Commissioners.

All unexpended moneys in the County Health Care Fund at the end
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4007 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4007 2026 Legislature
of each budget year shall remain in the County Health Care Fund
from year to year. Disbursements from the County Health Care
Fund shall be by check of the Martin County Board of County
Commissioners signed by its chairman upon the approval of a
majority of its members.
Section 3. (1) There shall be created a five (5) member
County Health Care Review Board to be comprised of:
(a) Two (2) members of the Martin County Board of County
Commissioners appointed by its chairman;
(b) Two (2) current or former members of the Martin
Memorial Health Systems Board or an affiliated board or
committee thereof appointed by the chairman of the Martin
Memorial Health Systems Board;
(c) One (1) member at large to be chosen by a majority of
the four (4) members so appointed.
(2) The terms of office of members shall expire January 15
of each year.
Section 4. The County Health Care Review Board shall
recommend to the Martin County Board of County Commissioners
those indigent individuals whose hospitalization and other costs
as set forth in section 2(1) shall be paid from the County
Health Care Fund.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4007 -00-er